Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-602 Federally funded programs;
exemption. Requirements relating to mandated coverages shall not be
applicable to any insurer offering accident and health or sickness insurance
under a federally funded program under the Social Security Act, as amended;
provided that this exemption shall apply only to that part of the insurer's
business under the federally funded program. [L 1999, c 159, §1; am L 2003, c
212, §81]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next